sv: Påsedesign: Anatomisk; Förstorande; C-ring; Formad; Platt; Fodrad; Ingen pouch; Öppen/titthål; Enkelt lager; Annat
nl: Pouch ontwerp: Anatomisch; Vergrotend; C-ring; Gevormd; Plat; Gevoerd; Geen pouch; Open/peek-a-boo; Enkele laag; Overig
pt-BR: Bolsa frontal design: Anatômico; Realce de volume; Anel em C; Contornado; Plano; Forrado; Sem bojo; Aberto/com recortes (peek-a-boo); Camada única; Outros
hr-HR: Dizajn torbice: Anatomski; S naglašavanjem; C-prsten; Oblikovani; Ravni; S podstavom; Bez vrećice; Otvoreno/Peek-a-boo; Jednoslojni; Ostalo
zh-TW: 前袋設計: 人體工學; 立體托高; C 型環; 立體剪裁; 平坦剪裁; 加裡布; 無囊袋; 開口/鏤空; 單層; 其他
ja: ポーチのデザイン: アナトミカル; もっこり強調; Cリング; 立体構造; フラット; 裏地付き; ポーチなし; オープン/穴あき; シングルレイヤー; その他
th: การออกแบบกระเป๋า: ตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; เสริมเป้า; ซีริง; โค้งรับสัดส่วน; แบนเรียบ; มีซับใน; ไม่มีกระเป๋าเป้า; เปิดเป้า/แหวกเป้า; ชั้นเดียว; อื่นๆ
el: Σχεδιασμός θήκης: Ανατομικό; Ενίσχυσης όγκου; C-ring; Με περίγραμμα; Επίπεδο; Με επένδυση; Χωρίς θήκη; Ανοιχτό/Peek-a-boo; Μονής στρώσης; Άλλο
fi: Pussin muotoilu: Anatominen; Kokoa korostava; C-rengas; Muotoiltu; Litteä; Vuorattu; Ei pussia; Avoin / kurkistusaukko; Yksikerroksinen; Muu
es: Diseño de bolsillos: Anatómico; Realce de bulto; Anillo C; Contorneado; Plano; Forrado; Sin bolsa; Abierto/peek-a-boo; De una sola capa; Otro
pl: Konstrukcja kieszeni przedniej: Anatomiczny; Uwypuklający; Z pierścieniem (C-ring); Wyprofilowany; Płaski; Z podszewką; Brak kieszonki; Otwarty/Peek-a-boo; Jednowarstwowy; Inne
pt-PT: Design da bolsa: Anatómica; Realce de volume; Anel em C; Contornada; Plana; Forrada; Sem bolsa; Aberta/peek-a-boo; Camada única; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika torbice: Anatomska; Za povečanje izbokline; Obroček (C-ring); Oblikovana; Ploska; Podložena; Brez mošnjička; Odprta (peek-a-boo); Enoslojna; Drugo
de: Design des Beutels: Anatomisch; Bulge-verstärkend; C-Ring; Konturiert; Flach; Gefüttert; Ohne Pouch; Offen/Peek-a-boo; Einlagig; Sonstige
ro-RO: Designul pungii: Anatomic; Cu efect de mărire; Inel C; Conturat; Plat; Căptușit; Fără buzunar; Deschis/Decupat; Un singur strat; Altele
vi: Thiết kế túi: Theo giải phẫu học; Nâng đỡ tạo dáng; Vòng đai chữ C; Tạo đường nét; Phẳng; Có lớp lót; Không khoét túi; Mở/Khoét lỗ; Một lớp; Khác
nb: Lommedesign: Anatomisk; Fremhevende; C-ring; Konturert; Flat; Fôret; Ingen lomme; Åpen/peek-a-boo; Enkelt lag; Annet
hu: Tasakkialakítás: Anatómiai; Kiemelő; C-gyűrű; Kontúros; Lapos; Bélelt; Nincs tasak; Nyitott/kukucskálós; Egyrétegű; Egyéb
cs: Design pouzdra: Anatomický; Zvýrazňující objem; C-kroužek; Tvarovaný; Plochý; Podšitý; Bez váčku; Otevřený / Peek-a-boo; Jednovrstvý; Jiné
sk-SK: Dizajn vrecka: Anatomický; Zvýrazňujúci; C-krúžok; Tvarovaný; Plochý; Podšitý; Bez vačku; Otvorený (peek-a-boo); Jednovrstvový; Iný
zh-CN: 前兜设计: 人体工学; 凸起增强; C 型环; 立体剪裁; 平坦; 带内衬; 无囊袋; 开孔/镂空; 单层; 其他
it: Design della busta: Anatomico; Con rigonfiamento accentuato; C-ring; Sagomato; Piatto; Foderato; Senza tasca; Aperto/peek-a-boo; A strato singolo; Altro
lt-LT: Priekinės kišenės dizainas: Anatominis; Išryškinantis; Su C žiedu; Kontūruotas; Plokščias; Su pamušalu; Be maišelio; Atviras / pusiau atviras; Vienasluoksnis; Kita
en: Pouch design: Anatomical; Bulge-enhancing; C-ring; Contoured; Flat; Lined; No pouch; Open/Peek-a-boo; Single layer; Other
da: Taskedesign: Anatomisk; Fremhævende; C-ring; Formet; Flad; Foret; Ingen pung; Åben/peek-a-boo; Enkelt lag; Andet
tr: Ön cep tasarımı: Anatomik; Dolgunlaştırıcı; C halka; Destekli; Düz; Astarlı; Kesesiz; Açık/Pencereli; Tek katmanlı; Diğer
bg-BG: Дизайн на джоба: Анатомичен; Подчертаващ обема; C-пръстен; Оформен; Плосък; Подплатен; Без джоб; Отворен (Peek-a-boo); Един слой; Друго
fr: Forme de la poche avant: Anatomique; Amplificatrice; Anneau (C-ring); Profilée; Plate; Doublée; Sans poche; Ouverte/découpe (peek-a-boo); Simple épaisseur; Autre
ru: Конструкция кармана-капюшона: Анатомический; С эффектом пуш-ап; С кольцом (C-ring); Контурный; Плоский; На подкладке; Без гульфика; Открытый/с вырезом; Однослойный; Другое
ko: 파우치 디자인: 인체공학적; 볼륨 강화; C-링; 입체형; 평면형; 안감 있음; 파우치 없음; 오픈/피카부; 단일 레이어; 기타